North Carolina, session 2025, HB917.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 143E of the General Statutes, Article 7C of Chapter 120 of the
General Statutes, and G.S. 120-32(1)j., 120-79(c), 120-131.1(a1), and 143-49(16), as those
statutes existed immediately before repeal, are reenacted.
SECTION 2. G.S. 63A-23 reads as rewritten:
"§ 63A-23. Annual reports.
The Authority shall, promptly following the close of each fiscal year, submit an annual
written report of its activities for the preceding year to the Governor, the General Assembly, and
the Local Government Commission. Each report shall be accompanied by an audit of its books
and accounts, as well as quarterly and annual financial statements. The audit shall be conducted
by the State Auditor. The costs of all audits shall be paid from funds of the Authority.
As part of the report, the Authority shall include the following performance measures of the
private sector jobs within the Global TransPark:
(1) The number, type, and wage level of jobs created or retained.
(2) The actual full-time equivalent jobs employed, as well as the median and
average salaries for those jobs.
The Authority shall submit its annual report to the General Assembly to both the Joint
Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations. Operations and the Data Analytics,
Transparency, and Accountability Division. The Authority shall also submit any information
about the Authority's activities that is requested by the Commission.
The Authority shall also provide a copy of its annual report on its public Web site."
SECTION 3. G.S. 90-414.5(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) At the written request of the Director of the Fiscal Research, Legislative Drafting, or
Legislative Analysis Analysis, or Data Analytics, Transparency, and Accountability Division of
the General Assembly for an aggregate analysis of the data and information disclosed through
the HIE Network, the Authority shall provide the professional staff of these Divisions with the
aggregated analysis responsive to the Director's request. Prior to providing the Director or
General Assembly's staff with any aggregate data or information submitted through the HIE
Network or with any analysis of this aggregate data or information, the Authority shall redact
any personal identifying information in a manner consistent with the standards specified for
de-identification of health information under the HIPAA Privacy Rule, 45 C.F.R. § 164.514, as
amended."
*H917-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4. G.S. 120-32.01 reads as rewritten:
"§ 120-32.01. Information to be supplied.
(a) Every State department, State agency, or State institution shall furnish the Legislative
Services Office and the Legislative Analysis, Fiscal Research, Data Analytics, Transparency, and
Accountability, and Legislative Drafting Divisions any information or records requested by them
and access to any facilities and personnel requested by them. Except when accessibility is
prohibited by a federal statute, federal regulation, or State statute, every State department, State
agency, or State institution shall give the Legislative Services Office and these divisions access
to any database or stored information maintained by computer, telecommunications, or other
electronic data processing equipment, whether stored on tape, disk, or otherwise, and regardless
of the medium for storage or transmission.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, access to the BEACON/HR payroll
system by the Legislative Analysis and Legislative Drafting Divisions shall only be through the
Fiscal Research Division.Division and access to the system by the Data Analytics, Transparency,
and Accountability Division shall only be through the Division Director and two employees of
the Division designated by the Division Director.
…."
SECTION 5. G.S. 126-85(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) The protections of this Article shall include State employees who report any activity
described in G.S. 126-84 (i) to the State Auditor as authorized by G.S. 147-64.6B, (ii) to the Joint
Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations as authorized by G.S. 120-76, or
G.S. 120-76, (iii) to the Data Analytics, Transparency, and Accountability Division as authorized
by G.S. 120-36.12(10), or (iv) to a legislative committee as required by G.S. 120-19."
SECTION 6. G.S. 143-341.2(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Duties of the Department of Administration. – The Department of Administration
shall have the following powers and duties:
…
(7) Reporting. – The Department of Administration shall make the following
reports:
a. No later than April 1, 2023, and every five years thereafter, the
Department shall report the following to the Joint Legislative
Commission on Governmental Operations and Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Capital Improvements, Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on General Government, Data Analytics,
Transparency, and Accountability Division, and Fiscal Research
Division:
1. The plan developed pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
2. A summary of the performance measurement procedures
developed pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection.
b. If any State agency fails to submit the information required by
subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the Department shall report the
failure to the chairs of the Joint Legislative Commission on
Governmental Operations, the chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Capital Improvements, the chairs of the Joint
Legislative Data Analytics, Transparency, and Accountability
Oversight Committee, and the chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on General Government within 30 days.
c. No later than April 1, 2024, and each year thereafter, the Department
shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental
Operations, Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Capital
Page 2 House Bill 917-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Improvements, Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General
Government, Data Analytics, Transparency, and Accountability
Division, and Fiscal Research Division on the State's portfolio of real
property. This report shall include at least the following information:
…."
SECTION 7. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the General Assembly
the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) for the 2025-2026 fiscal year in recurring funds for
the purpose of reenacting and operating the Data Analytics, Transparency, and Accountability
Division, as reestablished in this act.
SECTION 8. The Revisor of Statutes shall replace the phrase "Program Evaluation
Division" with the phrase "Data Analytics, Transparency, and Accountability Division" in the
General Statutes wherever it appears.
SECTION 9. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and Section 6 of this act
applies to reports due on or after that date.
House Bill 917-First Edition Page 3